src/verbgen.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +V +1p +2p +3p +sg +pl +mInd +mSub +mCond +mImp +tFut +tPres +tImp +tPret +pastPart +Gerund +Inf ^GV1 ^GV2 ^GV3
LEXICON Root
^GV1 Verb1;
^GV2 Verb2;
^GV3 Verb3;

!Verbs ending in ar
LEXICON Verb1
+V+1p+sg+tPres+mInd:^o #;
+V+2p+sg+tPres+mInd:^as #;
+V+3p+sg+tPres+mInd:^a #;
+V+1p+pl+tPres+mInd:^amos #;
+V+2p+pl+tPres+mInd:^áis #;
+V+3p+pl+tPres+mInd:^an #;

+V+1p+sg+tImp+mInd:^aba #;
+V+2p+sg+tImp+mInd:^abas #;
+V+3p+sg+tImp+mInd:^aba #;
+V+1p+pl+tImp+mInd:^ábamos #;
+V+2p+pl+tImp+mInd:^abais #;
+V+3p+pl+tImp+mInd:^aban #;

+V+1p+sg+tPret:^é #;
+V+2p+sg+tPret:^aste #;
+V+3p+sg+tPret:^ó #;
+V+1p+pl+tPret:^amos #;
+V+2p+pl+tPret:^asteis #;
+V+3p+pl+tPret:^aron #;

+V+1p+sg+tFut+mInd:^^é #;
+V+2p+sg+tFut+mInd:^^ás #;
+V+3p+sg+tFut+mInd:^^á #;
+V+1p+pl+tFut+mInd:^^emos #;
+V+2p+pl+tFut+mInd:^^éis #;
+V+3p+pl+tFut+mInd:^^án #;

+V+1p+sg+mCond:^^ía #;
+V+2p+sg+mCond:^^ía #;
+V+3p+sg+mCond:^^ía #;
+V+1p+pl+mCond:^^íamos #;
+V+2p+pl+mCond:^^íais #;
+V+3p+pl+mCond:^^ían #;

+V+1p+sg+tPres+mSub:^e #;
+V+2p+sg+tPres+mSub:^es #;
+V+3p+sg+tPres+mSub:^e #;
+V+1p+pl+tPres+mSub:^emos #;
+V+2p+pl+tPres+mSub:^éis #;
+V+3p+pl+tPres+mSub:^en #;

+V+1p+sg+tImp+mSub:^ara #;
+V+2p+sg+tImp+mSub:^aras #;
+V+3p+sg+tImp+mSub:^ara #;
+V+1p+pl+tImp+mSub:^áramos #;
+V+2p+pl+tImp+mSub:^arais #;
+V+3p+pl+tImp+mSub:^aran #;
+V+1p+sg+tImp+mSub:^ase #;
+V+2p+sg+tImp+mSub:^ases #;
+V+3p+sg+tImp+mSub:^ase #;
+V+1p+pl+tImp+mSub:^ásemos #;
+V+2p+pl+tImp+mSub:^aseis #;
+V+3p+pl+tImp+mSub:^asen #;

+V+1p+sg+tFut+mSub:^are #;
+V+2p+sg+tFut+mSub:^ares #;
+V+3p+sg+tFut+mSub:^are #;
+V+1p+pl+tFut+mSub:^áremos #;
+V+2p+pl+tFut+mSub:^areis #;
+V+3p+pl+tFut+mSub:^aren #;

+V+pastPart:^ado #;

+V+Gerund:^ando #;
+Inf:0 #;
!Verbs ending in er
LEXICON Verb2
+V+1p+sg+tPres+mInd:^o #;
+V+2p+sg+tPres+mInd:^es #;
+V+3p+sg+tPres+mInd:^e #;
+V+1p+pl+tPres+mInd:^emos #;
+V+2p+pl+tPres+mInd:^éis #;
+V+3p+pl+tPres+mInd:^en #;

+V+1p+sg+tImp+mInd:^ía #;
+V+2p+sg+tImp+mInd:^ías #;
+V+3p+sg+tImp+mInd:^ía #;
+V+1p+pl+tImp+mInd:^íamos #;
+V+2p+pl+tImp+mInd:^íais #;
+V+3p+pl+tImp+mInd:^ían #;


+V+1p+sg+tPret:^í #;
+V+2p+sg+tPret:^iste #;
+V+3p+sg+tPret:^ió #;
+V+1p+pl+tPret:^imos #;
+V+2p+pl+tPret:^isteis #;
+V+3p+pl+tPret:^ieron #;

+V+1p+sg+tFut+mInd:^^é #;
+V+2p+sg+tFut+mInd:^^ás #;
+V+3p+sg+tFut+mInd:^^ás #;
+V+1p+pl+tFut+mInd:^^emos #;
+V+2p+pl+tFut+mInd:^^éis #;
+V+3p+pl+tFut+mInd:^^án #;

+V+1p+sg+mCond:^^ía #;
+V+2p+sg+mCond:^^ía #;
+V+3p+sg+mCond:^^ía #;
+V+1p+pl+mCond:^^íamos #;
+V+2p+pl+mCond:^^íais #;
+V+3p+pl+mCond:^^ían #;

+V+1p+sg+tPres+mSub:^a #;
+V+2p+sg+tPres+mSub:^as #;
+V+3p+sg+tPres+mSub:^a #;
+V+1p+pl+tPres+mSub:^amos #;
+V+2p+pl+tPres+mSub:^áis #;
+V+3p+pl+tPres+mSub:^an #;

+V+1p+sg+tImp+mSub:^iera #;
+V+2p+sg+tImp+mSub:^ieras #;
+V+3p+sg+tImp+mSub:^iera #;
+V+1p+pl+tImp+mSub:^iéramos #;
+V+2p+pl+tImp+mSub:^ierais #;
+V+3p+pl+tImp+mSub:^ieran #;
+V+1p+sg+tImp+mSub:^iese #;
+V+2p+sg+tImp+mSub:^ieses #;
+V+3p+sg+tImp+mSub:^iese #;
+V+1p+pl+tImp+mSub:^iésemos #;
+V+2p+pl+tImp+mSub:^ieseis #;
+V+3p+pl+tImp+mSub:^iesen #;

+V+1p+sg+tFut+mSub:^iere #;
+V+2p+sg+tFut+mSub:^ieres #;
+V+3p+sg+tFut+mSub:^iere #;
+V+1p+pl+tFut+mSub:^iéremos #;
+V+2p+pl+tFut+mSub:^iereis #;
+V+3p+pl+tFut+mSub:^ieren #;

+V+pastPart:^ido #;

+V+Gerund:^iendo #;

+Inf:0 #;
!Verbs ending in ir
LEXICON Verb3
+V+1p+sg+tPres+mInd:^o #;
+V+2p+sg+tPres+mInd:^es #;
+V+3p+sg+tPres+mInd:^e #;
+V+1p+pl+tPres+mInd:^imos #;
+V+2p+pl+tPres+mInd:^ís #;
+V+3p+pl+tPres+mInd:^en #;

+V+1p+sg+tImp+mInd:^ía #;
+V+2p+sg+tImp+mInd:^ías #;
+V+3p+sg+tImp+mInd:^ía #;
+V+1p+pl+tImp+mInd:^íamos #;
+V+2p+pl+tImp+mInd:^íais #;
+V+3p+pl+tImp+mInd:^ían #;

+V+1p+sg+tPret:^í #;
+V+2p+sg+tPret:^iste #;
+V+3p+sg+tPret:^ió #;
+V+1p+pl+tPret:^imos #;
+V+2p+pl+tPret:^isteis #;
+V+3p+pl+tPret:^ieron #;

+V+1p+sg+tFut+mInd:^^é #;
+V+2p+sg+tFut+mInd:^^ás #;
+V+3p+sg+tFut+mInd:^^ás #;
+V+1p+pl+tFut+mInd:^^emos #;
+V+2p+pl+tFut+mInd:^^éis #;
+V+3p+pl+tFut+mInd:^^án #;

+V+1p+sg+mCond:^^ía #;
+V+2p+sg+mCond:^^ía #;
+V+3p+sg+mCond:^^ía #;
+V+1p+pl+mCond:^^íamos #;
+V+2p+pl+mCond:^^íais #;
+V+3p+pl+mCond:^^ían #;

+V+1p+sg+tPres+mSub:^a #;
+V+2p+sg+tPres+mSub:^as #;
+V+3p+sg+tPres+mSub:^a #;
+V+1p+pl+tPres+mSub:^amos #;
+V+2p+pl+tPres+mSub:^áis #;
+V+3p+pl+tPres+mSub:^an #;

+V+1p+sg+tImp+mSub:^iera #;
+V+2p+sg+tImp+mSub:^ieras #;
+V+3p+sg+tImp+mSub:^iera #;
+V+1p+pl+tImp+mSub:^iéramos #;
+V+2p+pl+tImp+mSub:^ierais #;
+V+3p+pl+tImp+mSub:^ieran #;
+V+1p+sg+tImp+mSub:^iese #;
+V+2p+sg+tImp+mSub:^ieses #;
+V+3p+sg+tImp+mSub:^iese #;
+V+1p+pl+tImp+mSub:^iésemos #;
+V+2p+pl+tImp+mSub:^ieseis #;
+V+3p+pl+tImp+mSub:^iesen #;

+V+1p+sg+tFut+mSub:^iere #;
+V+2p+sg+tFut+mSub:^ieres #;
+V+3p+sg+tFut+mSub:^iere #;
+V+1p+pl+tFut+mSub:^iéremos #;
+V+2p+pl+tFut+mSub:^iereis #;
+V+3p+pl+tFut+mSub:^ieren #;

+V+pastPart:^ido #;

+V+Gerund:^iendo #;
+Inf:0 #;
